Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201986-1231
Wireless provider, defined.

Wireless provider means a wireless services provider or a wireless infrastructure provider when acting as a coapplicant for a wireless services provider.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 31.